Illinois, session 104th, SB1718.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Back-to-School Sales Tax Holiday Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to create a 7temporary sales tax holiday in Illinois to help reduce the 8financial burden on families during the back-to-school season, 9provide relief to businesses, and support economic recovery by 10encouraging consumer spending. 11    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:12    "Eligible merchandise" means tangible personal property 13sold for use by students in the classroom or related 14educational activities, including, but not limited to:15        (1) Clothing with a sales price of $125 or less per 16    item.17        (2) School supplies, including notebooks, pens, 18    pencils, and other similar items.19        (3) Computers and computer software for noncommercial 20    use with a price of $1,000 or less.21        (4) Backpacks and other similar items used by students 22    for carrying school materials.  SB1718- 2 -LRB104 08114 HLH 18160 b1    "Sales tax" means the taxes imposed under the Use Tax Act, 2the Service Use Tax Act, the Service Occupation Tax Act, and 3the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.4    "Sales tax holiday period" means the period beginning at 512:01 a.m. on the first Friday in August of each year and 6ending at 11:59 p.m. on the following Sunday. 7    Section 15. Sales tax holiday.8    (a) During the Sales Tax Holiday Period, no sales tax 9shall be imposed on eligible merchandise purchased by any 10individual or entity in the State of Illinois.11    (b) The exemption applies to all eligible merchandise, as 12defined in Section 10, that is purchased for personal use. The 13exemption does not apply to:14        (1) merchandise purchased for resale;15        (2) items purchased for use in a business or trade; or16        (3) digital goods or services. 17    Section 20. Administration and implementation.18    (a) The Department of Revenue shall be responsible for the 19administration and implementation of this sales tax holiday. 20The Department shall provide guidance to retailers and the 21public regarding the items eligible for the sales tax holiday.22    (b) The Department of Revenue shall conduct an information 23campaign to inform consumers and businesses about the dates 24and scope of the sales tax holiday, including the types of   SB1718- 3 -LRB104 08114 HLH 18160 b1merchandise that are eligible for exemption. 2    Section 25. Reporting.3    (a) The Department of Revenue shall collect data and 4report on the total amount of sales tax revenue lost due to the 5sales tax holiday. This report shall be provided to the 6Governor and the General Assembly no later than 90 days 7following the conclusion of the sales tax holiday.8    (b) The Department of Revenue shall also provide an 9assessment of the economic impact of the sales tax holiday on 10the State economy, particularly in terms of retail sales and 11consumer spending. 12    Section 30. Severability. If any provision of this Act is 13held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions 14of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid 15provision, and to this end, the provisions of this Act are 16severable. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.